Utah statutes.
35A-8-901.   Assistance to domestic violence shelters -- Rulemaking authority.

(1) (a)  The Division of Child and Family Services within the Department of Human Services has statutory responsibility to provide violence services, including temporary shelter, to victims of domestic violence under the provisions of Sections 62A-4a-101 and 62A-4a-105.

(b)  The division may assist the Division of Child and Family Services by providing for the development, construction, and improvement of shelters for victims of domestic violence, as described in Section 77-36-1, through loans and grants to nonprofit and governmental entities.

(2) The division shall, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, make rules establishing:

(a)  procedures for applying for loans and grants;

(b)  criteria for awarding loans and grants; and

(c)  requirements for the repayment of loans.

(3)  The division may appoint an advisory panel to:

(a)  assist the division in developing rules under Subsection (2); and

(b)  recommend how available funds should be disbursed.

(4)  The division shall make loans and grants with money specifically appropriated for that purpose.

(5)  The division shall coordinate with the Division of Child and Family Services in complying with the provisions of this section.

